Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2,209
Registered office and registered
agent of foreign corporation.

(MBCA
15.07) Each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state
must continuously maintain in this state:

(1) A registered office that
may be the same as any of its places of business; and

(2) A registered agent, who may be:

(i) An individual who resides
in this state and whose business office is identical with the registered office;

(ii) A domestic corporation
or not-for-profit domestic corporation whose business office is identical
with the registered office; or

(iii) A foreign corporation or foreign not-for-profit
corporation authorized to transact business in this state whose business office
is identical with the registered office.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 209.